Missouri, session 2026, SB1120.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.058, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 537.058,
to read as follows:
537.058. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Extracontractual damages", any amount of damage
that exceeds the total available limit of liability
insurance for all of a liability insurer's liability
insurance policies applicable to a claim for personal
injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death;
(2) "[Time-limited] Settlement demand", any offer to
settle any claim for personal injury, bodily injury, or
wrongful death made by or on behalf of a claimant to a tort-
feasor with a liability insurance policy for purposes of
settling a claim against such tort-feasor within the
insurer's limit of liability insurance[, which by its terms
must be accepted within a specified period of time];
(3) "Tort-feasor", any person claimed to have caused
or contributed to cause personal injury, bodily injury, or
wrongful death to a claimant.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1120 2
2. [A time-limited] In any action alleging
extracontractual damages against the tort-feasor's liability
insurer, any prior settlement demand to settle any claim for
personal injury, bodily injury, or wrongful death shall not
be considered to have been a reasonable opportunity to
settle the claim unless the settlement demand was in
writing, [shall reference] referenced this section, [shall
be] sent by certified mail with return-receipt requested to
the tort-feasor's liability insurer, remained open for
acceptance by the liability insurer for at least ninety days
from the date such settlement demand was received by the
liability insurer, and [shall contain] contained the
following material terms:
(1) The time period within which the offer shall
remain open for acceptance by the tort-feasor's liability
insurer, [which shall not be less] if the time period for
acceptance is more than ninety days from the date such
demand is received by the liability insurer;
(2) The amount of monetary payment requested or a
request for the applicable policy limits;
(3) The date and location of the loss;
(4) The claim number, if known;
(5) A description of all known injuries sustained by
the claimant;
(6) The party or parties to be released if such [time-
limited] settlement demand is accepted;
(7) A description of the claims to be released if such
[time-limited] settlement demand is accepted; and
(8) An offer of unconditional release for the
liability insurer's insureds from all present and future
liability for that occurrence under section 537.060.

SB 1120 3
3. Such [time-limited] settlement demand shall be
accompanied by:
(1) A list of the names and addresses of health care
providers who provided treatment to or evaluation of the
claimant or decedent for injuries suffered from the date of
injury until the date of the [time-limited] settlement
demand, and HIPAA compliant written authorizations
sufficient to allow the liability insurer to obtain such
records from the health care providers listed; and
(2) A list of the names and addresses of all the
claimant's employers at the time the claimant was first
injured until the date of the [time-limited] settlement
demand, and written authorizations sufficient to allow the
liability insurer to obtain such records from all employers
listed, if the claimant asserts a loss of wages, earnings,
compensation, or profits however denominated.
4. If a liability insurer with the right to settle on
behalf of an insured receives a [time-limited] settlement
demand, such insurer may accept the [time-limited]
settlement demand by providing written acceptance of the
material terms outlined in subsection 2 of this section,
delivered or postmarked to the claimant or the claimant's
representative within the time period [set in the time-
limited demand] in which the settlement demand is open for
acceptance by the liability insurer, which in no event shall
be less than ninety days.
5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a claimant
making a [time-limited] settlement demand from requiring
payment within a specified period; provided, however, that
such period for payment shall not be less than ten days
after the insurer's receipt of a fully executed

SB 1120 4
unconditional release under section 537.060 as specified in
subsection 2 of this section.
6. Nothing in this section applies to offers or
demands or [time-limited] settlement demands issued within
ninety days of the trial by jury of any claim on which a
lawsuit has been filed.
7. In any lawsuit filed by a claimant as an assignee
of the tort-feasor or by the tort-feasor for the benefit of
the claimant, a [time-limited] settlement demand that does
not comply with the terms of this section shall not be
considered as a reasonable opportunity to settle for the
insurer and shall not be admissible in any lawsuit alleging
extracontractual damages against the tort-feasor's liability
insurer.
✓